New York, session 2025-2026, A3478.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 840 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) Establishment and implementation on an ongoing basis of a mental 4 health first aid training program for all current and new police offi- 5 cers and peace officers. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 7 law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07687-01-5